apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="perma/nere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>si</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nevate</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>neste</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nevi</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nesti</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ser</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sero</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rremmo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ngano</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>nesser</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrei</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>niamo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nga</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rreste</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rresti</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rrebber</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ngono</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrebbero</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrebbe</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ne</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rremo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sti</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sta</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sto</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nessimo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrò</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nessi</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrete</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>neste</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrai</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nessi</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rran</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rranno</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrà</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nevamo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nemmo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nevo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nessero</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nete</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nesse</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ni</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>niamo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nga</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>niate</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>nevan</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nga</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nevano</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nendo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>neva</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ngan</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>niamo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ngo</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nete</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ni</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ner</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ngon</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nere</l>
	  <r>nere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="piece__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pieta/s__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>tes</l>
	  <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="poc/o__det">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>hi</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>he</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="poco"><i>poc</i><par n="poc/o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="permanere"><i>perma</i><par n="perma/nere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rimanere"><i>rima</i><par n="perma/nere__vblex"/></e>
